District of Columbia statutes.
15-351

Definitions.

For the purposes of this subchapter, the term:

(1)

“District” means the District of Columbia.

(2)

“Foreign judgment” means any judgment, decree, or order of a court of the United States or of any other court that is entitled to full faith and credit in the District.

(3)

“Superior Court” means the Superior Court of the District of Columbia.

History

Oct. 2, 1990, D.C. Law 8-173, § 2(b), 37 DCR 5005

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 15-351.

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 1 of the Uniform Enforcement of Foreign Judgments Act (1964).